District of Columbia statutes.
51-115

Repealed

District of Columbia Unemployment Compensation Board; powers and duties; tenure of office; compensation.

Repealed.

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 954, ch. 794, § 16
renumbered § 15, June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 121, ch. 117, § 1
Aug. 31, 1954, 68 Stat. 996, ch. 1139, § 1
Dec. 22, 1971, 85 Stat. 773, Pub. L. 92-211, § 2(43)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-129, § 2(ee), 25 DCR 2451
Sept. 24, 1993, D.C. Law 10-15, § 213, 40 DCR 5420
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 268(f), 62 DCR 1884
This section is referenced in § 51-101 and § 51-104.
1981 Ed., § 46-116.
1973 Ed., § 46-315.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 213 of District of Columbia Unemployment Compensation Comprehensive Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-260, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2330).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 268(f) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 268(f) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).